Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2188
Encumbrances; duty of referee; notice of hearing.

The referee shall give the parties interested at least five days' notice of the time and place when he will receive proof of the amount of such encumbrances.

R.S.1867, Code § 821, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 8304;

C.S.1922, § 9256;

C.S.1929, § 20-2188;

R.S.1943, § 25-2188.